Illinois, session 104th, HB3957.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 6103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 7Section 5 of Article 50 as follows: 8    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 50, Section 5)9    Sec. 5. The sum of $2,366,193,700 2,326,878,700, or so 10much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 11General Revenue Fund to the Department of Central Management 12Services for Group Insurance. 13ARTICLE 214    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 15103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 16Section 1 of Article 51 as follows: 17    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 51, Section 1)18    Sec. 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes   HB3957- 2 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department of 2Children and Family Services:3ENTIRE AGENCY4PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND5  For Personal Services...........................373,582,7006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security.................................28,579,3008  For Contractual Services.........................42,263,5009  For Travel..........................................779,80010  For Commodities.....................................780,00011  For Printing........................................387,40012  For Equipment.....................................6,323,90013  For Electronic Data Processing........81,248,200 70,748,20014  For Telecommunications............................7,561,50015  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............759,50016    Total                            $542,265,800 531,765,800 17ARTICLE 318    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 19103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 20Section 820 of Article 52 as follows: 21    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 52, Section 820)22    Sec. 820. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   HB3957- 3 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 2grant to the DuSable Black History Dusable Museum and 3Education Center for costs associated with contingent and 4operational expenses. 5ARTICLE 46    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 7103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 8Sections 5, 25, and 145 of Article 53 as follows: 9    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 53, Section 5)10    Sec. 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 12hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 13contingent expenses of the Department of Natural Resources:14GENERAL OFFICE15Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For ordinary and contingent expenses, including17   payment of revolving fund bills..................2,812,50018  For expenses of the General Office...............10,665,00019  For expenses related to Diversity, Equity, 20   Inclusion and Accessibility (DEIA) goals............60,00021  For grants and expenses associated with the22   Youth and Young Adult Conservation and 23    Education Pilot Program.........................2,500,000  HB3957- 4 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:2  For Contractual Services ............................70,0003Payable from the State Parks Fund:4  For Contractual Services ............................70,5005Payable from the Wildlife and Fish Fund:6  For Personal Services ..............................150,0007  For State Contributions to State 8   Employees' Retirement System ......................76,800 9  For State Contributions to 10   Social Security ....................................11,50011  For Group Insurance .................................62,60012  For Contractual Services ...........................618,80013  For Travel ...........................................5,00014  For Equipment ........................................1,10015Payable from the Underground Resources 16 Conservation Enforcement Fund:17  For Contractual Services .................................018  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses................265,90019Payable from the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund:20  For Ordinary and Contingent Expenses.................35,00021Payable from the Federal Surface Mining Control and  22 Reclamation Fund:23  For ordinary and contingent expenses for the 24   support of the Land Reclamation program............341,90025Payable from Park and Conservation Fund: 26  For Contractual Services............................405,000  HB3957- 5 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  For expenses of the Park and2   Conservation Program.............................2,200,0003Payable from the Abandoned Mined Lands4Reclamation Council Federal Trust Fund:5  For ordinary and contingent expenses for 6   the support of the Abandoned Mined Lands 7   program............................................511,7008    Total                                         $20,863,300 9    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 53, Section 25)10    Sec. 25. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 12hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 13contingent expenses of the Department of Natural Resources: 14OFFICE OF REALTY AND CAPITAL PLANNING15Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For expenses of the Office of Realty17   and Capital Planning.............................5,606,40018Payable from the State Boating Act Fund:19  For Personal Services ....................................020  For State Contributions to State 21   Employees' Retirement System ............................022  For State Contributions to 23   Social Security .........................................024  For Group Insurance ......................................0  HB3957- 6 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  For expenses of the Heavy Equipment2   Dredging Crew......................................834,0003  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 4   Capital Planning...................................275,0005Payable from the State Parks Fund:6  For Commodities ......................................7,5007  For Equipment........................................20,0008  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 9   Capital Planning...................................150,00010Payable from Wildlife and Fish Fund:11  For Equipment .......................................10,00012  For expenses of the Heavy Equipment13   Dredging Crew......................................211,70014  For expenses of the Office of Realty and 15   Capital Planning...................................175,00016Payable from the Natural Areas Acquisition Fund:17  For expenses of Natural Areas Execution.............207,80018Payable from Open Space Lands Acquisition 19 and Development Fund: 20  For expenses of the OSLAD Program: ...............1,447,80021Payable from the Partners for 22 Conservation Fund:23  For expenses of the Partners for Conservation24   Program............................................871,50025Payable from the Historic Property Administrative Fund26  For administrative purposes associated  HB3957- 7 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   with the Historic Tax Credit Program...............500,0002Payable from the DNR Federal Projects Fund:3  For federal projects,4   including but not limited to5   FEMA natural disaster projects and6   federally declared disaster response7   and repair.........................................200,0008Payable from the Illinois Wildlife  9 Preservation Fund:10  For operation of Consultation Program.............1,073,10011Payable from Park and Conservation Fund:12  For the Office of Realty and13   Capital Planning.................................5,008,00014  For expenses of the Bikeways Program ...............525,00015    Total                                         $17,122,800 16    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 53, Section 145)17    Sec. 145. The sum of $8,750,000 4,360,000, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tourism 19Promotion Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the 20costs associated with historic preservation and site 21management including, but not limited to, operational 22expenses, grants, awards, maintenance, repairs, permanent 23improvements, and special events. 24    Section 2. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act   HB3957- 8 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by adding Section 2125, and repealing Section 105 of Article 54 as follows: 3    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 54, Section 125 new)4    Sec. 125. The sum of $656,000, or so much thereof as may be 5necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Department of Natural Resources for expenses for two dam 7safety studies in Rock Island County. 8    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 54, Section 105, rep.)9    Section 105. Section 105 of Article 54 of Public Act 10103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is repealed. 11ARTICLE 512    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 13103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 14Section 20 and adding Section 23 of Article 56 as follows: 15    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 56, Section 20)16    Sec. 20. The amount of $1,050,437 4,283,499, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the 18close of business on June 30, 2024, from a reappropriation 19heretofore made in Article 50, Section 20 of Public Act 20103-0006, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 21Corrections from the General Revenue Fund for expenses related   HB3957- 9 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1to the necessary replacement of aging and unreliable 2telecommunication systems.  3    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 56, Section 23 new)4    Sec. 23. The amount of $2,364,742, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 6Corrections from the General Revenue Fund for deposit into the 7Department of Corrections Reimbursement and Education Fund for 8expenses related to the necessary replacement of aging and 9unreliable telecommunication systems. 10ARTICLE 611    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 12103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 13Section 145 and adding Sections 155 and 160 and repealing 14Section 150 of Article 61 as follows: 15    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 61, Section 145)16    Sec. 145. The sum of $4,000,000 16,250,000, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 18Revenue Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 19Regulation for Electronic Data Processing to implement and 20administer a new licensing system. 21    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 61, Section 155 new)  HB3957- 10 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1    Sec. 155. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 4Regulation for deposit into the Professions Licensure Fund. 5    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 61, Section 160 new)6    Sec. 160. The amount of $17,855,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Professions 8Licensure Fund to the Department of Financial and Professional 9Regulation for the implementation and administration of a new 10licensing system. 11    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 61, Section 150, rep.)12    Section 150. Section 150 of Article 61 of Public Act 13103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is repealed. 14ARTICLE 715    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 16103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 17Sections 1, 15, 155, 930, 1000, 1036, and 1040 of Article 63 as 18follows: 19    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 1)20    Sec. 1. The sum of $946,001,500 931,001,500, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General   HB3957- 11 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services for ordinary 2and contingent expenses of the department, permanent 3improvements and for student, member or inmate compensation 4expenses of the department for the fiscal year ending June 30, 52025. 6    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 15)7    Sec. 15. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 9purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Department 10of Human Services for income assistance and related 11distributive purposes, including such Federal funds as are 12made available by the Federal Government for the following 13purposes:14DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS15GRANTS-IN-AID16Payable from General Revenue Fund:17  For Aid to Aged, Blind or Disabled18   under Article III...............................33,504,70019  For Temporary Assistance for Needy20   Families under Article IV and other21   social services including Emergency22   Assistance for families with23   Dependent Children.............................242,400,00024  For Refugees......................................1,126,70025  For Funeral and Burial Expenses under  HB3957- 12 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   Articles III, IV, and V, including2   prior years' costs...............................5,000,0003  For grants and administrative expenses4   associated with Child Care Services, including5   prior years' costs.................692,099,000 617,099,0006  For grants and administrative expenses7   associated with Refugee Social Services............204,0008  For grants and administrative expenses9   associated with Immigrant Integration10   Services and for other Immigrant Services11   pursuant to 305 ILCS 5/12-4.34..................38,000,00012  For grants and administrative expenses13   associated with the Illinois14   Welcoming Centers..................122,400,000 139,400,00015Payable from the DHS State Projects Fund16  For grants and administrative expenses17   Associated with the Illinois18   Welcoming Centers...............................30,000,00019    Total                        $1,164,734,400 1,106,734,400 20    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 155)21    Sec. 155. The sum of $282,300,000 $290,300,000, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 23Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services for grants 24and administrative expenses of the Home Illinois Program, 25including pilot programs, to prevent and end homelessness in   HB3957- 13 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Illinois, including, but not limited to homelessness 2prevention, emergency and transitional housing, rapid 3rehousing, outreach, and related services and supports for 4individuals at risk or experiencing homelessness, including 5homeless veterans, in the approximate amounts below:6  For Shelter and Other Services for 7   Homeless Populations............................67,300,0008  For Emergency & Transitional Housing.............42,000,0009  For Court-Based Rental Assistance................75,000,00010  For Rapid Rehousing..............................25,000,00011  For Homelessness Prevention......................16,200,00012  For Home Illinois Pilot Programs,13   Research and Other Initiatives..................16,100,00014  For Scattered Site Permanent Supportive Housing..12,500,00015  For Addressing Homelessness Racial Disparities...13,000,00016  For Access to Counsel.............................5,000,00017  For Youth Homelessness Program....................4,500,00018  For Supportive Housing Services Program...........4,150,00019  For Shelter Diversion.............................3,700,00020  For Medical Respite Capacity Building.............3,500,00021  For MI Supportive Housing.........................2,350,00022    Total                                        $290,300,000 23    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 930)24    Sec. 930. The amount of $2,500,000, that was appropriated 25from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Human   HB3957- 14 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Services for grants to non-profit organizations for costs 2associated with operating expenses in State fiscal year 2024 3by Article 56, Section 1210 of Public Act 103-0006, as 4amended, or so much thereof as may be necessary and remains 5unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2024, is hereby 6appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 7Department of Human Services for grants to non-profit 8organizations for costs associated with operating expenses, 9including prior years' costs. 10    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 1000)11    Sec. 1000. The amount of $450,000, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Human 13Services for an initial full year's implementation of a grant 14to University of Illinois at Chicago for assessing non-profit 15vendor that can compare and assess addiction treatment 16facilities to identify high quality providers and provide a 17publicly available search function for patients, health care 18providers, and first responders to find substance use disorder 19in State fiscal year 2024 by Article 56, Section 1295 of Public 20Act 103-0006, as amended, or so much thereof as may be 21necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business on 22June 30, 2024, is hereby appropriated to from the Fund for 23Illinois' Future to the Department of Human Services for an 24initial full year's implementation of a non-profit vendor that 25can compare and assess addiction treatment facilities to   HB3957- 15 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1identify high quality providers and provide a publicly 2available search function for patients, health care providers, 3and first responders to find substance use disorder, including 4prior years' costs. 5    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 1036)6    Sec. 1036. The amount of $16,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Department of Human Services for grants and 9administrative services associated with violence prevention 10programs, youth employment programs, and operational expenses 11to the following named entities, in the approximate amounts 12below:13  HAIBAYO Cares.......................................500,00014  Good Neighbors Network..............................500,00015  McLean County Center for Human Services.............500,00016    Board of Education of the City of Chicago17  for a grant to Earhart Elementary School............500,00018  Zacharias Sexual Abuse Center of Lake County........500,00019  JCFS Chicago........................................500,00020  Boys and Girls Club of Chicago......................500,00021  Lutheran Social Services............................500,00022    Helping our People Excel 23  Community Development Corporation...................500,00024  Deborah's Place Women's Shelter.....................500,00025  INC Mental Health Alliance..........................500,000  HB3957- 16 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  The Restorative Project.............................500,0002  Rincon Family Services of Cicero....................500,0003  PASO - West Suburban Action Project.................500,0004  Community Foundation of Northern Illinois...........500,0005  Community Foundation of Northern Illinois...........500,0006  Metro East Every Survivor Counts....................500,0007  West Suburban Community Pantry......................500,0008  Metropolitan Family Services Calumet................500,0009  Operation Peace, Inc................................500,00010  Indo-American Center................................500,00011  Family Health Partnership in Crystal Lake...........500,00012  Northwest Compass...................................500,00013  Rincon Family Services in Gage Park.................500,00014  North Lawndale Catalyst Initiative..................500,00015  The Josselyn Center, Nfp............................500,00016  Ecker Center for Behavioral Health..................500,00017  West Chicago Elementary School District #33.........500,00018  Nourishing Hope Headquarters........................500,00019  Hope Center Foundation..............................500,00020  Vernon Township.....................................500,00021  DuPage Pads.........................................500,000 22    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 63, Section 1040)23    Sec. 1040. The amount of $44,882,000, or so much thereof 24as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 25Fund to the Department of Human Services for grants and   HB3957- 17 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1administrative services associated with violence prevention 2programs, youth employment programs, and operational expenses 3to the following named entities, in the approximate amounts 4below:5  Segundo Ruiz Belvis.................................250,0006  Puerto Rican National Museum........................250,0007  Grace and Peace.....................................250,0008  Puerto Rican Cultural Center .......................250,0009  Joe W Roberts Youth Club............................250,00010  Terron Armstead Foundation..........................250,00011  Kathryn Dunham Museum...............................250,00012  H.O.M.E (House Of Miles East St Louis)..............250,00013  Casa Michocan.......................................250,00014  Centro de Informacion...............................250,00015  Partners for Our Communities........................250,00016  WINGS...............................................300,00017  Youth Crossroads....................................250,00018  Esperanza Health Centers............................250,00019  Corazon Community Services..........................250,00020  A&L Youth And Family Services.......................550,00021  North Lawndale Eagles Youth Program.................100,00022  Food Basket Foundation Inc..........................350,00023  Young Doctors NFP....................................80,00024  The Reign Project Limited...........................300,00025  Project Impact......................................594,89226  Non Profit Utopia LLC...............................300,000  HB3957- 18 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  Men Making a Difference (MMAD)......................165,2702  Teaching NFP........................................309,8383  Special Children's Charity..........................250,0004  Arab American Services..............................250,0005  Beverly Arts Center.................................250,0006  Community Partners for Affordable Housing...........250,0007  Prairie State Legal Services........................250,0008    Court Appointed Special9  Advocates (CASA) Lake County........................250,00010  Loaves and Fishes...................................250,00011  Glen Ellyn House Food Pantry........................250,00012  The Outreach House..................................250,00013    Champaign County Court Appointed 14  Special Advocates For Children (CASA)...............250,00015  James B. Moran Center for Youth Advocacy............250,00016  Family Service Center...............................250,00017  Arts of Life........................................250,00018  Peer Services.......................................250,00019  Fresh Films.........................................200,00020  Ada S. McKinley...................................1,200,00021  Coalition Legal ....................................250,00022  Black Abolition Movement for the mind (BAMM)........250,00023  Community Assistance Programs CAPS................1,000,00024  Home Sweet Home Ministry ...........................250,00025  Community Health Care Clinic .......................250,00026  EAST BLUFF Community Center.........................250,000  HB3957- 19 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  Peoria Housing Authority ...........................250,0002  Fresh Start Intervention ...........................250,0003  Institute For Nonviolence Chicago ..................250,0004  Business Model Group ...............................250,0005  Black Men United ...................................250,0006  Polish American Association.........................250,0007  Leyden Family Services..............................250,0008  Maryville Crisis Nursery............................250,0009  Misercordia.........................................250,00010  Writers Theater.....................................250,00011  Art Impact..........................................250,00012  North Suburban Shore Legal Aid Clinic...............250,00013  Trinity Services Inc Northwest for Disabled ........250,00014    Teach Different dba Illinois15  Institute of Independent Colleges and Universities..250,00016  Center of Concern - Des Plaines.....................250,00017  MothersOnAMission28.................................250,00018  Centro Trabajadores Unidos..........................250,00019    Adler University for its Creating Healing of 20  Inside Community Educators Program..................500,00021  Kates Detective and Security Academy................500,00022  The Greater Englewood Chamber of Commerce...........500,00023  Uptown People's Law Center..........................250,00024  ONE Northside.......................................250,00025  Shoot for the Stars.................................250,00026  Community Counseling Centers of Chicago.............250,000  HB3957- 20 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  Concordia Place.....................................250,0002  Puerto Rican Cultural Center........................250,0003  Rincon Family Service...............................250,0004  Skywalker Outreach Services.........................250,0005  Will Grundy Medical Clinic..........................250,0006  Fairmont Community Center...........................250,0007  Community Organizing and Family Issues (COFI).......250,0008  Family Focus Aurora ................................250,0009  Despertar Latino....................................250,00010  Prairie State Legal Services........................250,00011  Niles Township Early Childhood Alliance.............250,00012    The Chicago Center for Torah &13  Chesed Inc..........................................250,00014  North River Commission Youth Council................250,00015  NAMI Illinois.......................................250,00016  Northwest Compass...................................250,00017  Frisbee Senior Center...............................250,00018  Champs Mentoring....................................250,00019  Public Image Partnership............................500,00020  LMW Group ..........................................250,00021  Greater Chatham Initiative..........................250,00022  Peace for Preston...................................250,00023  Mayfair Academy.....................................250,00024  Ted and Kelli London Charitable Foundation .........250,00025  Black Oaks Foundation ..............................100,00026  SkillsUSA Illinois................................1,000,000  HB3957- 21 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  Access to Care....................................1,000,0002  MyOwnDoctor.......................................1,000,0003  TASC, Inc ........................................1,000,0004  Illinois Equal Justice Foundation.................1,500,0005  Illinois Farm to Food Bank Program................2,500,0006  The Chicago Lighthouse ...........................2,615,0007  Food For Greater Elgin..............................250,0008  Kennedy Forum.......................................300,0009  Josselyn............................................350,00010  CPASS...............................................500,00011    University of Illinois at Chicago for its 12  Brothers Teaching Initiative Program................500,00013  BUILD INC...........................................517,00014  Farm to Food......................................2,500,00015  Urban Autism Solutions............................1,000,00016  Phalanx Family Services...........................1,000,00017  Kerengende Foundations..............................250,00018  Anshe Emet Synagogue Community Assistance Fund......250,00019  Common food pantry..................................300,000 20    Section 2. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 21103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 22Section 200 of Article 130 as follows: 23    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 130, Section 200)24    Sec. 200. The sum of $8,372,700, or so much thereof as may   HB3957- 22 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 2on June 30, 2024, from an appropriation heretofore made for 3such purpose in Article 123, Section 245 of Public Act 4103-0006, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 5Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 6Department of Human Services for a grant to United Power for 7purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 8Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 9prior years' costs. 10ARTICLE 811    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 12103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 13Section 60 of Article 64 as follows: 14    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 64, Section 60)15    Sec. 60. The sum of $20,034,200, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Health 17Benefits Exchange Fund to the Department of Insurance for 18costs associated with the implementation of the Illinois 19Health Benefits Exchange costs associated with implementation 20of a healthcare feasibility study recommendation. 21ARTICLE 9  HB3957- 23 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 2103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by adding Section 335 of Article 65 as follows: 4    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 65, Section 35 new)5    Sec. 35. The sum of $200,000,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Department of Innovation and Technology for deposit into 8the Technology Management Revolving Fund. 9ARTICLE 1010    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 11103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 12Sections 10 and 25 of Article 69 as follows: 13    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 69, Section 10)14    Sec. 10. The amount of $2,483,500,000 2,238,500,000, or so 15much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated to the 16Department of Healthcare and Family Services from the General 17Revenue Fund for deposit into the Healthcare Provider Relief 18Fund. 19    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 69, Section 25)20    Sec. 25. In addition to any amounts heretofore 21appropriated, the following named amounts, or so much thereof   HB3957- 24 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 2Department of Healthcare and Family Services for Medical 3Assistance and Administrative Expenditures:4Payable from Care Provider Fund for Persons5 with a Developmental Disability:6  For Administrative Expenditures.....................300,0007Payable from Long-Term Care Provider Fund:8  For Skilled, Intermediate, and Other Related 9   Long-Term Care Services and Payments10   to Managed Care Organizations..................875,000,00011  For Administrative Expenditures...................6,109,60012    Total                                        $881,109,60013Payable from Hospital Provider Fund:14  For Hospitals, Capitated Managed Care15   Organizations as necessary to comply16   with Article V-A of the17   Illinois Public Aid Code, and Related 18   Operating and Administrative  19   Costs..........................6,050,000,000 4,500,000,00020Payable from Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:21  For Medical Assistance Providers................800,000,00022Payable from Healthcare Provider Relief Fund:23  For Medical Assistance Providers24   and Related Operating and25   Administrative Costs.........16,955,500,000 16,305,500,000   HB3957- 25 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1ARTICLE 112    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 3103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 4Sections 30 and 45 of Article 70 as follows: 5    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 70, Section 30)6    Sec. 30. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 8Public Health for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:9OFFICE OF HEALTH PROMOTION10Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:11  For All Costs Associated With12   Health Promotion programs,13   Including Prior Years' Costs ....................3,674,40014Payable from the General Revenue Fund:15  For Expenses of Sudden Infant Death Services Inc.16   of IL(SIDS) Program................................244,40017  For Expenses Related to an Alzheimer's18   Disease Research, Care and Support Program.......2,000,00019  For Expenses Related to a Suicide Prevention,20   Education, and Treatment Program...................750,00021  For All Costs Associated with the Community22   Health Worker Program............................2,500,00023  For Expenses for the University of24    Illinois Sickle Cell Clinic.......................483,900  HB3957- 26 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  For Deposit into the Sickle Cell2   Chronic Disease Fund.............................1,000,0003  For a grant to the National Kidney4   Foundation of Illinois for Kidney Disease5   Care Services......................................550,0006  For Grants to Northwestern University7   for the Illinois Violent Death Reporting8   System to Analyze Data, Identify Risk9   Factors and Develop Prevention Efforts..............76,70010  For Prostate Cancer Awareness.......................146,60011  For a Grant to the Advocate Illinois12   Masonic Medica Center for All Costs13   Associated with Mobile Dental Services.............375,00014  For Grants for Vision and Hearing15   Screening Programs.................................441,70016  For a Grant to the Oral Health Forum17   for All Costs Associated with18   Oral Health Programs...............................100,00019  For Grants and Administrative Costs Associated20   with Health Care Telementoring..................5,000,000 21  For a Grant to the Dental Lifeline Network 22   to Provide Dental Care and Education................72,00023Payable from the Alzheimer's Disease Research,24   Care, and Support Fund:25  For Grants and Expenses Pursuant to the Alzheimer's26   Disease Research, Care, and Support Fund Act.......500,000  HB3957- 27 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:2  For Grants for Public Health Programs,3    Including Operational Expenses, including4    prior years' costs..............................9,530,0005Payable from the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund:6  For Expenses of the Medical 7   Cannabis Program.................................8,772,6008Payable from the Childhood Cancer Research Fund:9  For Grants for Childhood Cancer Research.............75,00010Payable from the Epilepsy Treatment and Education11  Grants-in-Aid Fund:12  For Expenses of the Education and Treatment13    of Epilepsy........................................30,00014Payable from the Diabetes Research Checkoff Fund:15  For Expenses for the American Diabetes16   Association to Conduct Diabetes Research...........125,00017  For Expenses for the BreakthroughT1D.org Juvenile  18   Diabetes Research Foundation to19   Conduct Diabetes Research..........................125,00020Payable from the Sickle Cell Chronic Disease Fund:21  For Grants and Administrative Costs for the22   Awareness, Prevention, Care, and Treatment23   of Sickle Cell Disease...........................1,000,00024Payable from the Multiple Sclerosis Research Fund:25  For Grants to Conduct Multiple26   Sclerosis Research...............................1,000,000  HB3957- 28 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Payable from the Autoimmune Disease Research Fund:2  For Grants for Autoimmune Disease3   Research and Treatment..............................50,0004Payable from the Prostate Cancer Research Fund:5  For Grants to Public and Private Entities6   in Illinois for Prostate7   Cancer Research.....................................30,0008Payable from the Healthy Smiles Fund:9  For Expenses of the Healthy Smiles Program..........400,00010Payable from the DHS Private Resources Fund:11  For Expenses of Diabetes Research Treatment12   and Programs.......................................700,00013Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:14  For All Costs Associated with15   Asthma Prevention................................3,000,00016  For Colorectal, Prostate, and 17   Lung Cancer Grants...............................2,000,00018  For Certified Local Health Department19   Grants for Health Protection Programs Including,20   but not Limited to, Infectious21   Diseases, Food Sanitation,22   Potable Water, Private Sewage23   and Anti-Smoking Programs........................5,000,00024  For a Grant to the American Lung Association25   for Operations of the Quitline...................5,100,00026  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for  HB3957- 29 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   the Tobacco Use Prevention Program,2   BASUAH Program, and Asthma Prevention............1,000,0003Payable from the Public Health Federal Projects Fund:4  For expenses related to the Community Health5   Worker Certification and Reimbursement Act6   and for Purposes Stated in Public Act 102-4......1,500,0007Payable from the Maternal and Child8  Health Services Block Grant Fund:9  For Operational Expenses of Maternal and10   Child Health Programs..............................500,00011  For Grants for Maternal and Child Health12   Programs...........................................995,00013Payable from the Preventive Health14  and Health Services Block Grant Fund:15  For Expenses of Preventive Health and16   Health Services Programs.........................1,726,80017  For Grants for Prevention Initiative Programs18   Including Operational Expenses...................1,000,00019Payable from the Public Health Special20   State Projects Fund:21    For Expenses for Public Health Programs.........1,500,00022Payable from the Metabolic Screening and 23 Treatment Fund:24  For Operational Expenses for Metabolic25   Screening Follow-up Services.....................5,505,10026  For Grants for Metabolic Screening  HB3957- 30 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   Follow-up Services...............................3,250,0002  For Grants for Free Distribution of Medical3   Preparations and Food Supplies...................4,175,0004Payable from the Cannabis Regulation Fund:5  For Costs and Administrative Expenses6   of the Adult-Use Cannabis Program..................500,0007Payable from the Hearing Instrument 8 Dispenser Examining and Disciplinary Fund:9  For Expenses Pursuant to the Hearing10   Instrument Consumer Protection Act.................100,000 11    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 70, Section 45)12    Sec. 45. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 14Public Health for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:15OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION16Payable from the General Revenue Fund:17  For Expenses Incurred for the Rapid18   Investigation and Control of19   Disease or Injury..................................448,50020  For Expenses of Environmental Health21   Surveillance and Prevention22   Activities, Including Mercury23   Hazards and West Nile Virus........................299,20024  For Expenses for Expanded Lab Capacity25   and Enhanced Statewide Communication  HB3957- 31 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   Capabilities Associated with2   Homeland Security..................................322,6003  For Deposit into Lead Poisoning4   Screening, Prevention, and Abatement5   Fund.............................................6,000,0006  For Grants for Immunizations and7   Outreach Activities..............................4,157,1008  For a Grant to the Will County Public Health9   Department for All Costs Associated with10   Programmatic Services..............................335,00011Payable from the Food and Drug Safety Fund:12  For Expenses of Administering13   the Food and Drug Safety14   Program, Including Refunds.........................300,00015Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:16  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards17  Including Services Performed by Local Health18  Providers For All Costs Associated with19  Health Care Regulation, Surveillance,20  and Monitoring, Including21  Prior Years' Costs...............................55,449,80022  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards23   Including Testing and Services Performed by24   Local Health Providers, Including Prior25   Years' Costs...................................550,000,00026    Total                                        $605,449,800  HB3957- 32 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Payable from the Safe Bottled Water Fund:2  For Expenses for the Safe Bottled3   Water Program.......................................50,0004Payable from the Facility Licensing Fund:5  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of6   Environmental Health Programs....................3,300,0007Payable from the Illinois School Asbestos 8 Abatement Fund:9  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of10   Administering and Executing11   the Asbestos Abatement Act and12   the Federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency13   Response Act of 1986 (AHERA).....................1,200,00014Payable from the Emergency Public Health Fund:15  For Expenses of Mosquito Abatement in an16   Effort to Curb the Spread of West17   Nile Virus and Other Vector Borne Diseases.......5,100,00018Payable from the Public Health Water Permit Fund:19  For Expenses, Including Refunds,20   of Administering the Illinois Groundwater21   Protection Act.....................................100,00022Payable from the Used Tire Management Fund:23  For Expenses of Vector Control Programs,24   Including Mosquito Abatement.....................1,300,00025Payable from the Tattoo and Body Piercing 26 Establishment Registration Fund:  HB3957- 33 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1  For Expenses of Administering of2   Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment3   Registration Program...............................605,0004Payable from the Lead Poisoning Screening, 5 Prevention, and Abatement Fund:6  For Expenses of the Lead Poisoning7   Screening, Prevention, and8   Abatement Program, Including Refunds.............8,414,6009  For Grants for the Lead Poisoning Screening10   and Prevention Program...........................5,500,00011Payable from the Tanning Facility Permit Fund:12  For Expenses to Administer the13   Tanning Facility Permit Act,14   Including Refunds..................................300,00015Payable from the Plumbing Licensure 16 and Program Fund:17  For Expenses to Administer and Enforce18   the Illinois Plumbing License Law,19   Including Refunds................................3,950,00020Payable from the Pesticide Control Fund:21  For Public Education, Research,22   and Enforcement of the Structural23   Pest Control Act...................................577,70024Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:25  For Grants and Administrative Expenses26   Associated with a Pilot Project for  HB3957- 34 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   Community-Based Tuberculosis Prevention,2   Follow-up, and Treatment...........................500,0003Payable from the Private Sewage Disposal 4 Program Fund:5  For Expenses of Administering the6   Private Sewage Disposal Program....................292,0007Payable from the Personal Property Tax8  Replacement Fund:9  For Local Health Protection Grants10   to Certified Local Health Departments11   for Health Protection Programs Including,12   but not Limited to, Infectious13   Diseases, Food Sanitation,14   Potable Water and Private Sewage................20,098,50015Payable from the Public Health Federal 16 Projects Fund:17  For Grants and Administrative Expenses18   of Health Information Technology Activities19   and Electronic Health Records....................4,000,00020Payable from the Public Health Special 21 State Projects Fund:22  For Expenses of Conducting EPSDT23   and Other Health Protection Programs............48,200,000 24ARTICLE 12  HB3957- 35 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 2103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 3Section 10 of Article 80 as follows: 4    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 80, Section 10)5    Sec. 10. The amount of $995,100 $955,100, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road 7Fund to the Executive Ethics Commission for its ordinary and 8contingent expenses. 9ARTICLE 1310    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 11103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 12Section 10 of Article 84 as follows: 13    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 84, Section 10)14    Sec. 10. The sum of $6,000,000 750,000, or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 16Underground Utility Facilities Damage Prevention Fund to the 17Illinois Commerce Commission for a grant to the Statewide 18One-call Notice System, as required in the Illinois 19Underground Utility Facilities Damage Prevention Act. 20ARTICLE 14  HB3957- 36 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 2103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 3Section 85 of Article 86 as follows: 4    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 86, Section 85)5    Sec. 85. The sum of $7,000,000 5,000,000, or so much 6therefore as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid 7Waste Management Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency 8for all costs associated with solid waste management 9activities, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 2. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 11103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 12Sections 25, 90, and 95 of Article 152 as follows: 13    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 152, Section 25)14    Sec. 25. The sum of $259,568,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Water Revolving Fund to 16the Environmental Protection Agency for financial assistance 17for lead service line replacement as authorized by section 181459B of the Safe Drinking Water Act. 19    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 152, Section 90)20    Sec. 90. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the U.S. Environmental 22Protection Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for   HB3957- 37 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1Federal share of all costs associated with the Battery 2Recycling Program as authorized by the Infrastructure 3Investment Jobs Act. 4    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 152, Section 95)5    Sec. 95. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Solid Waste Management 7Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for State share of 8all costs associated with the Battery Recycling Program as 9authorized by the Infrastructure Investment Jobs Act. 10ARTICLE 1511    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 12103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 13Section 55 of Article 91 as follows: 14    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 91, Section 55)15    Sec. 55. The amount of $600,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 17the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for costs 18associated with implementation of the Public Act 101-652 19Pretrial Fairness Act. 20ARTICLE 16  HB3957- 38 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 2103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 3Section 5 of Article 101 as follows: 4    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 101, Section 5)5    Sec. 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Law Enforcement Training Standards 9Board:10OPERATIONS11Payable from the Police Training Board Services Fund:12  For payment of and/or services13   related to law enforcement training14   in accordance with statutory provisions15   of the Law Enforcement Intern16   Training Act.......................................105,00017Payable from the Law Enforcement Training Fund:18  For payment of and/or reimbursement of basic training and19   basic training services in accordance with statutory20   provisions.......................................8,000,00021  For payment of and/or reimbursement of in-service training22   services in accordance with statutory23   provisions......................................15,000,00024  For Personal Services.............................5,806,40025  For State Contributions to State Employees' Retirement  HB3957- 39 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1   System...........................................3,000,0002  For State Contributions to Social Security..........500,0003  For Group Insurance...............................2,200,0004  For Contractual Services..........................3,000,0005  For Travel..........................................100,0006  For Commodities.....................................100,0007  For Printing........................................150,0008  For Equipment.......................................540,0009  For Electronic Data Processing....................1,147,70010  For Telecommunications Services.....................300,00011  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................167,50012    Total                                         $40,011,60013Payable from the Law Enforcement Camera 14 Grant Fund:15  For grants to units of16   local government in Illinois17   related to installing video cameras18   in law enforcement vehicles, and19   training law enforcement officers20   in the operation of the cameras, and21   expenses related to data storage22   and related licensing costs, in23   accordance with statutory provisions24   of the Law Enforcement Camera25   Grant Act.......................................60,000,000   HB3957- 40 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1ARTICLE 172    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 3103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 4Section 15 of Article 103 as follows: 5    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 103, Section 15)6    Sec. 15. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Prisoner Review Board for costs associated with 9providing legal counsel and operational expenses and for 10deposit into the Technology Management Revolving Fund. 11ARTICLE 1812    Section 1. "AN ACT concerning appropriations", Public Act 13103-0589, approved June 5, 2024, is amended by changing 14Section 160 of Article 127 as follows: 15    (P.A. 103-0589, Article 127, Section 160)16    Sec. 160. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois DREAM Fund to 18the Illinois Student Assistance Commission to assist in 19funding scholarships and other statutory responsibilities of 20the Illinois DREAM Fund Commission grant scholarships to 21public university and college students for the Illinois DREAM   HB3957- 41 -OMB104 00149 VOT 10149 b1scholarship program. 2ARTICLE 9993    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect 4immediately.